Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1131
Accident; report required; investigation; cleanup and recovery plan.

The applicator or the permitholder shall report an actual or suspected accident related to the use of chemigation in his or her system to the department and the appropriate district within twenty-four hours of its discovery. Any accident resulting from the use of chemigation shall be investigated by the appropriate district and the department. In the event that the district or the department finds an adverse effect caused by such an accident, the department shall (1) determine the immediate danger presented by the accident, (2) take all steps necessary to assure immediate public safety, and (3) develop a plan of cleanup and recovery. The cleanup and recovery plan shall be carried out by the permitholder under the supervision of the department or the district.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 31.